South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S272.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "State Employment Skills-Based Hiring Act". SECTION 2.  Article 1, Chapter 11, Title 8 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 8-11-188.  (A) The Office of Human Resources shall periodically review the educational, experiential, and training requirements for all jobs in the executive branch to determine whether the educational, experiential, and training requirements for each job can be reduced without sacrificing the quality of service provided by the job. The Office of Human Resources shall pay special attention to jobs that require a four-year college degree as a condition of employment. (B) The Office of Human Resources shall adjust the educational, experiential, and training requirements for all jobs that they identify as suitable for a reduction in requirements as provided in subsection (A), provided that the educational, experiential, and training requirements are not established in law or regulation. (C) Following each periodic review pursuant to subsection (A), the Office of Human Resources shall issue a report of its actions to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Chairman of the Senate Labor, Commerce and Industry Committee, the House of Representatives Labor, Commerce and Industry Committee, and the Governor. The report shall also identify any jobs that the Office of Human Resources finds suitable for a reduction in requirements but whose requirements are established in law or regulation. SECTION 3.  The first periodic review by the Office of Human Resources required pursuant to this act shall begin at least ninety days after the approval by the Governor. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----